Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2943
Manner of voting.

(1) Proxy voting by members is prohibited.

(2) Delegate voting based upon geographical district, group, or class is not voting by proxy under this section.

(3) The articles of organization or bylaws may provide for member voting by secret ballot delivered by mail or other means.

(4) The articles of organization or bylaws may provide for members to attend meetings or conduct members' meetings through the use of any means of communication, if all members attending the meeting can simultaneously communicate with each other during the meeting.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 43.